Illinois, session 104th, HB4057.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. If and only if Senate Bill 1667 of the 104th 5General Assembly becomes law in the form in which it passed the 6Senate on April 10, 2025, then the Revised Uniform Unclaimed 7Property Act is amended by changing Section 15-102 as follows:  8    (765 ILCS 1026/15-102)9    Sec. 15-102. Definitions. In this Act:10        (1) "Administrator" means the State Treasurer. 11        (2) "Administrator's agent" means a person with which 12    the administrator contracts to conduct an examination 13    under Article 10 on behalf of the administrator. The term 14    includes an independent contractor of the person and each 15    individual participating in the examination on behalf of 16    the person or contractor. 17        (2.5) (Blank).18        (3) "Apparent owner" means a person whose name appears 19    on the records of a holder as the owner of property held, 20    issued, or owing by the holder. 21        (4) "Business association" means a corporation, joint 22    stock company, investment company, unincorporated 23    association, joint venture, limited liability company,   HB4057- 2 -LRB104 13643 JRC 26285 b1    business trust, trust company, land bank, safe deposit 2    company, safekeeping depository, financial organization, 3    insurance company, federally chartered entity, utility, 4    sole proprietorship, or other business entity, whether or 5    not for profit.6        (5) "Confidential information" means information that 7    is "personal information" under the Personal Information 8    Protection Act, "private information" under the Freedom of 9    Information Act or personal information contained within 10    public records, the disclosure of which would constitute a 11    clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy, unless 12    the disclosure is consented to in writing by the 13    individual subjects of the information as provided in the 14    Freedom of Information Act.15        (6) "Domicile" means:16            (A) for a corporation, the state of its 17        incorporation;18            (B) for a business association whose formation 19        requires a filing with a state, other than a 20        corporation, the state of its filing;21            (C) for a federally chartered entity or an 22        investment company registered under the Investment 23        Company Act of 1940, the state of its home office; and 24            (D) for any other holder, the state of its 25        principal place of business.26        (7) "Electronic" means relating to technology having   HB4057- 3 -LRB104 13643 JRC 26285 b1    electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, 2    electromagnetic, or similar capabilities. 3        (8) "Electronic mail" means a communication by 4    electronic means which is automatically retained and 5    stored and may be readily accessed or retrieved. 6        (8.5) "Escheat fee" means any charge imposed solely by 7    virtue of property being reported as presumed abandoned. 8        (9) "Financial organization" means a bank, savings 9    bank, foreign bank, corporate fiduciary, currency 10    exchange, money transmitter, or credit union.11        (9.5) "Finder" means (i) a person engaged in the 12    location, recovery, purchase, or assignment of property 13    held by the administrator for a fee, compensation, 14    commission, or other remuneration paid by the owner of the 15    property or (ii) a person engaged in assisting in the 16    location, recovery, purchase, or assignment of property 17    held by the administrator for a fee, compensation, 18    commission, or other remuneration paid by the owner of the 19    property. "Finder" does not include (A) a person holding a 20    durable power of attorney of a person who is medically 21    incapacitated; (B) a bankruptcy trustee, bankruptcy estate 22    representative, or other person or business association 23    authorized pursuant to Title 11 of the U.S. Code or an 24    order of a bankruptcy court to act on behalf of or for the 25    benefit of the reported owner's creditors and bankruptcy 26    estate, or the successor or assignee thereof; (C) an   HB4057- 4 -LRB104 13643 JRC 26285 b1    assignee for the benefit of a business association's 2    creditors pursuant to applicable state or federal law, or 3    the successor or assignee thereof; (D) a court-ordered 4    receiver for a business association, or the successor or 5    assignee thereof; (E) a survivor, corporate designee, 6    assignee, successor, governor, or delegate of a business 7    association pursuant to a merger, conversion, acquisition, 8    divestiture, joint venture, assignment, wind-down, 9    resolution, or corporate reorganization, or the successor 10    or assignee thereof; (F) an employee of an owner; and (G) 11    any other person that is entitled to receive the property 12    under other law, court order, or policy. 13        (10) "Game-related digital content" means digital 14    content that exists only in an electronic game or 15    electronic-game platform. The term:16            (A) includes: 17                (i) game-play currency such as a virtual 18            wallet, even if denominated in United States 19            currency; and20                (ii) the following if for use or redemption 21            only within the game or platform or another 22            electronic game or electronic-game platform: 23                    (I) points sometimes referred to as gems, 24                tokens, gold, and similar names; and 25                    (II) digital codes; and26            (B) does not include an item that the issuer:  HB4057- 5 -LRB104 13643 JRC 26285 b1                (i) permits to be redeemed for use outside a 2            game or platform for:3                    (I) money; or 4                    (II) goods or services that have more than 5                minimal value; or6                (ii) otherwise monetizes for use outside a 7            game or platform.8        (11) "Gift card" means a record evidencing a promise 9    made for consideration by the seller or issuer of the 10    record that goods, services, or money will be provided to 11    the owner of the record to the value or amount shown in the 12    record that is either:13            (A) a record:14                (i) issued on a prepaid basis primarily for 15            personal, family, or household purposes to a 16            consumer in a specified amount;17                (ii) the value of which does not expire;18                (iii) that is not subject to a dormancy, 19            inactivity, or post-sale service fee;20                (iv) that is redeemable upon presentation for 21            goods or services; and 22                (v) that, unless required by law, may not be 23            redeemed for or converted into money or otherwise 24            monetized by the issuer; or25            (B) a prepaid commercial mobile radio service, as 26        defined in 47 CFR 20.3, as amended.  HB4057- 6 -LRB104 13643 JRC 26285 b1        (12) "Holder" means a person obligated to hold for the 2    account of, or to deliver or pay to, the owner, property 3    subject to this Act.4        (13) "Insurance company" means an association, 5    corporation, or fraternal or mutual-benefit organization, 6    whether or not for profit, engaged in the business of 7    providing life endowments, annuities, or insurance, 8    including accident, burial, casualty, credit-life, 9    contract-performance, dental, disability, fidelity, fire, 10    health, hospitalization, illness, life, malpractice, 11    marine, mortgage, surety, wage-protection, and 12    worker-compensation insurance.13        (14) "Loyalty card" means a record given without 14    direct monetary consideration under an award, reward, 15    benefit, loyalty, incentive, rebate, or promotional 16    program which may be used or redeemed only to obtain goods 17    or services or a discount on goods or services. The term 18    does not include a record that may be redeemed for money or 19    otherwise monetized by the issuer.20        (15) "Mineral" means gas, oil, coal, oil shale, other 21    gaseous liquid or solid hydrocarbon, cement material, sand 22    and gravel, road material, building stone, chemical raw 23    material, gemstone, fissionable and nonfissionable ores, 24    colloidal and other clay, steam and other geothermal 25    resources, and any other substance defined as a mineral by 26    law of this State other than this Act.  HB4057- 7 -LRB104 13643 JRC 26285 b1        (16) "Mineral proceeds" means an amount payable for 2    extraction, production, or sale of minerals, or, on the 3    abandonment of the amount, an amount that becomes payable 4    after abandonment. The term includes an amount payable: 5            (A) for the acquisition and retention of a mineral 6        lease, including a bonus, royalty, compensatory 7        royalty, shut-in royalty, minimum royalty, and delay 8        rental; 9            (B) for the extraction, production, or sale of 10        minerals, including a net revenue interest, royalty, 11        overriding royalty, extraction payment, and production 12        payment; and 13            (C) under an agreement or option, including a 14        joint-operating agreement, unit agreement, pooling 15        agreement, and farm-out agreement. 16        (17) "Money order" means a payment order for a 17    specified amount of money. The term includes an express 18    money order and a personal money order on which the 19    remitter is the purchaser. 20        (18) "Municipal bond" means a bond or evidence of 21    indebtedness issued by a municipality or other political 22    subdivision of a state.23        (19) "Net card value" means the original purchase 24    price or original issued value of a stored-value card, 25    plus amounts added to the original price or value, minus 26    amounts used and any service charge, fee, or dormancy   HB4057- 8 -LRB104 13643 JRC 26285 b1    charge permitted by law.2        (20) "Non-freely transferable security" means a 3    security that cannot be delivered to the administrator by 4    the Depository Trust Clearing Corporation or similar 5    custodian of securities providing post-trade clearing and 6    settlement services to financial markets or cannot be 7    delivered because there is no agent to effect transfer. 8    The term includes a worthless security. 9        (21) "Owner", unless the context otherwise requires, 10    means a person that has a legal, beneficial, or equitable 11    interest in property subject to this Act or the person's 12    legal representative when acting on behalf of the owner. 13    The term includes:14            (A) a depositor, for a deposit; 15            (B) a beneficiary, for a trust other than a 16        deposit in trust; 17            (C) a creditor, claimant, or payee, for other 18        property; and 19            (D) the lawful bearer of a record that may be used 20        to obtain money, a reward, or a thing of value. 21        (22) "Payroll card" means a record that evidences a 22    payroll-card account as defined in Regulation E, 12 CFR 23    Part 1005, as amended.24        (23) "Person" means an individual, estate, business 25    association, public corporation, government or 26    governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or   HB4057- 9 -LRB104 13643 JRC 26285 b1    other legal entity, whether or not for profit. 2        (24) "Property" means tangible property described in 3    Section 15-205 or a fixed and certain interest in 4    intangible property held, issued, or owed in the course of 5    a holder's business or by a government, governmental 6    subdivision, agency, or instrumentality. The term: 7            (A) includes all income from or increments to the 8        property;9            (B) includes property referred to as or evidenced 10        by:11                (i) money, virtual currency, interest, or a 12            dividend, check, draft, deposit, or payroll card; 13                (ii) a credit balance, customer's overpayment, 14            stored-value card, security deposit, refund, 15            credit memorandum, unpaid wage, unused ticket for 16            which the issuer has an obligation to provide a 17            refund, mineral proceeds, or unidentified 18            remittance; 19                (iii) a security except for: 20                    (I) a worthless security; or 21                    (II) a security that is subject to a lien, 22                legal hold, or restriction evidenced on the 23                records of the holder or imposed by operation 24                of law, if the lien, legal hold, or 25                restriction restricts the holder's or owner's 26                ability to receive, transfer, sell, or   HB4057- 10 -LRB104 13643 JRC 26285 b1                otherwise negotiate the security;2                (iv) a bond, debenture, note, or other 3            evidence of indebtedness; 4                (v) money deposited to redeem a security, make 5            a distribution, or pay a dividend; 6                (vi) an amount due and payable under an 7            annuity contract or insurance policy; 8                (vii) an amount distributable from a trust or 9            custodial fund established under a plan to provide 10            health, welfare, pension, vacation, severance, 11            retirement, death, stock purchase, profit-sharing, 12            employee-savings, supplemental-unemployment 13            insurance, or a similar benefit; and 14                (viii) any instrument on which a financial 15            organization or business association is directly 16            liable; and 17            (C) does not include:18                (i) game-related digital content;19                (ii) a loyalty card;20                (iii) a gift card; or21                (iv) funds on deposit or held in trust 22            pursuant to Section 16 of the Illinois Pre-Need 23            Cemetery Sales Act.24        (25) "Putative holder" means a person believed by the 25    administrator to be a holder, until the person pays or 26    delivers to the administrator property subject to this Act   HB4057- 11 -LRB104 13643 JRC 26285 b1    or the administrator or a court makes a final 2    determination that the person is or is not a holder. 3        (26) "Record" means information that is inscribed on a 4    tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or 5    other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form. The 6    phrase "records of the holder" includes records maintained 7    by a third party that has contracted with the holder.8        (27) "Security" means: 9            (A) a security as defined in Article 8 of the 10        Uniform Commercial Code;11            (B) a security entitlement as defined in Article 8 12        of the Uniform Commercial Code, including a customer 13        security account held by a registered broker-dealer, 14        to the extent the financial assets held in the 15        security account are not:16                (i) registered on the books of the issuer in 17            the name of the person for which the broker-dealer 18            holds the assets; 19                (ii) payable to the order of the person; or 20                (iii) specifically indorsed to the person; or 21            (C) an equity interest in a business association 22        not included in subparagraph (A) or (B).23        (28) "Sign" means, with present intent to authenticate 24    or adopt a record:25            (A) to execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or 26            (B) to attach to or logically associate with the   HB4057- 12 -LRB104 13643 JRC 26285 b1        record an electronic symbol, sound, or process.2        (29) "State" means a state of the United States, the 3    District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, the 4    United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular 5    possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United 6    States.7        (30) "Stored-value card" means a card, code, or other 8    device that is:9            (A) issued on a prepaid basis primarily for 10        personal, family, or household purposes to a consumer 11        in a specified amount, whether or not that amount may 12        be increased or reloaded in exchange for payment; and 13            (B) redeemable upon presentation at multiple 14        unaffiliated merchants for goods or services or usable 15        at automated teller machines; and 16        "Stored-value card" does not include a gift card, 17    payroll card, loyalty card, or game-related digital 18    content.19        (31) "Utility" means a person that owns or operates 20    for public use a plant, equipment, real property, 21    franchise, or license for the following public services:22            (A) transmission of communications or information;23            (B) production, storage, transmission, sale, 24        delivery, or furnishing of electricity, water, steam, 25        or gas; or 26            (C) provision of sewage or septic services, or   HB4057- 13 -LRB104 13643 JRC 26285 b1        trash, garbage, or recycling disposal.2        (32) "Virtual currency" means any type of digital 3    unit, including cryptocurrency, used as a medium of 4    exchange, unit of account, or a form of digitally stored 5    value, which does not have legal tender status recognized 6    by the United States. The term does not include:7            (A) the software or protocols governing the 8        transfer of the digital representation of value; 9            (B) game-related digital content; or10            (C) a loyalty card or gift card.11        (33) "Worthless security" means a security whose cost 12    of liquidation and delivery to the administrator would 13    exceed the value of the security on the date a report is 14    due under this Act.15(Source: P.A. 101-552, eff. 1-1-20; 102-288, eff. 8-6-21; 1610400SB1667eng.)